Biker reacts at a lightning-fast and prevents worse
On Friday evening, a traffic accident occurred on the road between Machtolsheim and Merklingen, in which a motorcyclist was only slightly injured thanks to his rapid reaction.
Motorist overlooks bikers
A 44-year-old motorist wanted to turn left from Merklingen with her VW from Merklingen to turn left onto Landesstraße 1230 in the direction of Machtolsheim.
Here she overlooked the 24-year-old motorcyclists coming from the direction of Nellingen.
During the collision, hand and foot brake levers fly away when the collision
The biker tried to avoid the car, but roamed it at the rear of the vehicle.
Due to the stripping, the hand and foot brake levers were demolished on the Suzuki and the driver was no longer able to brake down.
In the mind, he controlled his motorcycle in the green stiff next to the road and let it roll out there without coming to fall.
Bikiker suffers leg injury
Due to the collision with the car, the biker suffered an injury and had to be treated in a clinic.
Mamming: Corona Mass Infection: 174 harvesters infected
After a mass corona mass infection on a large vegetable farm in Mamming in Lower Bavaria, almost 500 people are quarantined and are not allowed to leave the farm.
A security service monitors the ban on going out.
A total of 174 harvesters were tested positively for the Corona pathogen Sars-CoV-2, as reported by the Landratsamt Dingolfing-Landau on Saturday evening.
"In order to avoid further spread, we unfortunately have to take this step in order to protect the population," said District Administrator Werner Bumeder (CSU).
Previously, seven employees had already been infected in the company - this was the reason for the series test.
The farm is a large vegetable farm, which cultivates strawberries, cucumbers, cabbage and red beetroot - but the cucumbers only for inlaid glasses.
Mamming is a rural community with about 3300 inhabitants not far from Dingolfing with its large BMW plant.
Bumeder appealed to the citizens to maintain calm: "According to our information, it is a closed group of people".
On the farm, infected were separated from uninfected employees, the grounds is now surrounded by a shut-off fence.
The Greens and SPD shared responsibility to the state government.
The two opposition groups accused Prime Minister Markus Söder (CSU) and his cabinet of neglecting the control of housing of seasonal workers.
"This can be bitter revenge if such local infections have to be taken and regional lockdowns have to be ordered," said JÃ1 ⁄ 4rgen Mistol, the parliamentary managing director of the Greens.
The SPD sees this similarly: "After the Corona outbreak in the Wiesenhof-Schlachthof in mid-May, we have already called for a special control program for farms with harvesters," said environmental expert Florian von Brunn.
"In our view, the hygiene conditions at the workplace and the living conditions have to be closely controlled.
That obviously didn't happen. "
The outbreak had come "with announcement".
Aidenbachstraße Underground Station: Dangerous dispute: 19-year-old falls into the track bed after Schubser
In a dispute between two youth groups at the Aidenbachstraße subway station, a 19-year-old fell through a push and slipped into the track bed.
Obersendling - On Friday there was a dispute between two youth groups at the Aidenbachstraße at 16.15 p.m.
A passers-by alerted the police with several stripes.
According to the first investigation, a Munich (17) pushed a 19-year-old to the ground.
The young man slipped over the edge of the platform and fell into the track bed.
People from the group of the 17-year-old helped the crashed out of the track.
There was no danger from a incoming railway.
According to the police, there were clashes between the two people.
The 17-year-old fled from the crime scene, but his personal data could be found in retrospect.
In the company of his father, he went to Polizeiinspektion 29.
The 17-year-old is determined for bodily injury.
Report: Seehofer urges for longer data retention
Data retention is currently suspended.
According to a media report, Federal Minister of the Interior Horst Seehofer calls for an extension of the storage period.
He wants to strengthen the fight against child abuse.
According to a media report, Federal Minister of the Interior Horst Seehofer (CSU) calls for an extended data retention - instead of the planned ten weeks for half a year.
As the "Bild am Sonntag" reports, Seehofer Justice Minister Christine Lambrecht (SPD) asked for a rapid change of the law in a letter.
Seehofer wants to strengthen the measures against child abuse.
He considers it useful to "make urgently needed adjustments in the law now," the newspaper quotes from the letter.
Currently, the retention of data is currently suspended.
A decision of the ECJ is expected.
But Seehofer wants to apply the changes beforehand so that they could be applied immediately after a possible positive judgment, the report continues.
A spokesman for the Ministry of Justice told the newspaper that it was only possible to check whether legal adjustments if the courts had decided.
In the fight against child abuse and child pornography, Seehofer, together with the interior ministers of the federal states.
NBA: Stripclub trouble for Clippers-Star Lou Williams
Excitement in the NBA!
Lou Williams (33), basketball professional of the Los Angeles Clippers, is said to have left the tournament quarters in Disney World in Orlando / Florida with permission for a funeral.
According to US media reports, he visited the strip club "Magic City" in Atlanta in the evening.
Williams, who is said to have admitted the visit according to ESPN, is back in isloation, is tested on Covid-19.
His reason for the visit: Chicken Wings.
In February last year, "Sweet Lou", as he is called in the NBA, has already expressed his love for exactly these wings.
The American wrote: "Magic City and Blue Flame (another strip club in Atlanta, usually) have the best wings in the city."
NBA insider Shams Charania announced on Twitter on Sunday that the NBA Williams has ordered a ten-day quarantine.
The Clippers-Star missed the first two official games after the test game phase.
In Disney World, the NBA wants to play the Corona season.
Currently, the best 22 teams with training matches are preparing for the season finals which starts in the night of Friday.
Söder manifests after mass infecton on the corona situation after mass infecton
Munich - Health Minister Melanie Huml (CSU) has already announced a test offensive for large farms on Sunday.
The press conference will be seen live on our website.
The case in Mamming in the district of Dingolfing-Landau has starghtened authorities and politicians.
On the large vegetable farm currently has almost 500 harvesting from several countries are currently working on the large vegetable farm, more than a third have been infected with the corona pathogen.
The farm is now under quarantine and is blocked off with a building fence.
No one is allowed to leave the premises, food is delivered.
The authorities are now offer free corona tests to the more than 3,300 residents of the municipality now offer free corona tests to the more than 3,300 residents of the municipality.
Since the harvesters had little contact with the local population, the district office assumes that the infections have not spread beyond the farm.
"Bangs of Conscience": confession of the alleged arson of Nantes
"My client has shown himself cooperative," said lawyer Quentin Chabert told the newspaper.
The defender added, "He regrets the actions, the confession was a liberation for him."
His mandate was "plagued by bangs of conscience and very taken away by the extent of the destruction".
In the case of a conviction, according to the prosecutor's office, ten years in imprisonment and a fine of 150,000 euros.
The Gothic Saint Peter and Paul's Cathedral in Nantes was severely damaged by a fire on the night of Saturday last week.
The fire broke out in three far distant places in the church.
Laboratory tests hardened the suspicion of arson.
The suspect detained suspect was arrested a few hours after the fire.
He was released after one day.
The man works as a volunteer for the diocese of Nantes and was responsible for the closure of the cathedral on the eve before the fire.
Since there was no trace of violent penetration into the church, he quickly came into the field of the investigators.
Discuss the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule
Former DFB President Reinhard Grindel has recommended thinking about the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule.
"German football should at least discuss, defining conditions and clear rules for investors before the EU Commission creates complete facts," said Grindel, the "Bild am Sonntag".
He emphasized: "The 50 + 1 rules do not work for the clubs that are most dangerous to Bavaria and Dortmund, the 50 + 1 rules do not work anyway: see Leipzig or Leverkusen.
In this respect, one does not get around the debate about whether it is not necessary to facilitate the involvement of investors for associations that want to break into this phalanx to facilitate the involvement of investors. "
However, he has doubts whether there is in the German Football League there is the willingness to allow majority participation, which are forbidden in the Bundesliga by the 50 + 1 rule in the Bundesliga.
"It remains a legal risk to draw investment fences around the Bundesliga as a business location in a European single market," said Grindel.
The former DFB boss sees the danger that "the attempts to improve the competitive balance in the Bundesliga will only weaken the competitiveness of our top clubs at European level, but will not lead to more excitement in the championship."
Even a equal distribution of TV funds would not have a decisive effect.
"FC Bayern has a turnover of 750 million euros, Borussia Dortmund of 500 million and RB Leipzig of 300 million.
The differences are immense among the first three clubs.
The other 15 clubs have an average budget of 130 million, "said the 58-year-old explained.
With a view of the past, Grindel feels betrayed.
"Unfortunately, there have been people who have noticed this mistake and stabbed the press instead of addressing me about it," said Grindel about the adoption of an expensive watch that had led to his resignation in April 2019.
"That has already occupied me humanly."
He had received the gift worth around 11,000 euros from a Ukrainian functionary.
"I committed a compliance violation, and it was right to draw the consequences from it," said Grindel.
"With the ominous watch gift, I handled completely transparently and susplessly with ominous watch gift.
Many in the DFB knew about this. "
He never "made a secret of the present," assured the 58-year-old.
"This may be called naive, at least, this form of transparency was the complete opposite of corruption."
"Black Lives Matter": injured and a dead
The protests against police violence in the United States have intensified by Donald Trump ’ s use of federal police in several cities.
On Saturday, clashes between protesters and police in various cities.
In Louisville, three people were injured in Louisville and 16 people were arrested in Seattle.
In Austin, a person was killed by shots, while a demonstration was just crossing a crossing.
Previously, clashes in Portland during protests against racism and police violence.
The security forces, including officials from the Federal police, used tear gas on the night of Saturday and forcibly attacked demonstrators.
Hundreds of partly armed demonstrators marched through Louisville in Kentucky on Saturday, demanding that those responsible for the death of Breonna Taylor be held to account.
The 26-year-old student was shot in a drug raids at her home in Louisville in March.
The aim of the raid was someone else who did not live there, and no drugs were found.
When a member of a group calling itself as an armed alliance of black Americans shot a shot on Saturday, three people were injured.
According to NBC, they were taken to the hospital.
None of them were in danger of life.
The police set up barricades because counter-demonstrators of a white militia had formed.
The meeting between the two groups.
In Austin, Texas, a person was shot and died as part of a "Black Lives Matter" demonstration.
The police took a suspect in custody.
She has not given any further information about the circumstances of the incident.
Mayor Steve Adler, according to the "New York Times" that he, like many in the city, he was "unconsoled and stunned" because of what happened.
Also in the American metropolis of Seattle, demonstrators also had clashes with the police on Saturday in the American metropolis of Seattle on Saturday.
They set fire on fire in front of a juvenile prison, and the police used glare grenades and pepper spray.
According to the Seattle Times, 16 people were arrested for resistance to police or bodily injury.
In the city of Oakland, California, a courthouse was set on fire in the city of Oakland, California.
A small group of demonstrators had hit windows, shot down fireworks, and police officers blinded with lasers, the Oakland police reported on late Saturday night (local time).
The fire was quickly extinguished.
In Aurora, a suburb of Denver, Colorado, a car drove through a crowd demonstrating on a highway.
As the police reported, one of the demonstrators fired a gun and at least one person was taken to the hospital in injured.
In addition, windows were also in a court and a fire was set, as the police reported.
Investigations have been undertaken.
Rakoczy in Bad Kissingen: Historical costumes defy Corona
Although the big break in the spa town, visitors and performers enjoyed the Rakoczy flair of the alternative program.
It was unfamiliar for visitors, performers and organizers: The Rakoczy weekend without a Rakoczy festival.
But: Even if the big party mile in the city center was missing, the crowds and program highlights such as Saale burns, Rakoczy ball or procession, many got their money in the Corona-compliant alternative program.
"I think we have succeeded in spreading Rakoczy flair," says Course Director Sylvie Thormann.
The guests would have accepted it well.
In principle, one return to the beginnings of the Rakoczy festival, as well as the historically were in the focus of the festival.
Pleasant atmosphere
For more than 25 years, Vesna Konhäuser and her husband for more than 25 years to the Rakoczy festival Bad Kissingen for more than 25 years.
So this time in the Corona year.
The couple made themselves comfortable at the Luitpold Casino, observes the historic things strolling, and listens to the Cuban live music at the casino restaurant.
"I find it very pleasant," says Konhäuser.
She does not miss the crowds that otherwise belong to Rakoczy.
For this, however, she lacks the usual program highlights, especially Saale burns on Friday evening as well as the historic procession and the final fireworks on Sunday evening.
"That's a pity.
The weather would have been great this year, "she says.
Rakoczy riding tournament to take place again
For the performers of the historical spa guests, the alternative program meant more work for the performers of the historical spa guests.
For example, for Christina Gold, who participates in the procession in a normal year and can be seen on the carriage of the Kurgartencafés.
This year she was on foot in the city on Saturdays and Sundays in costume on foot in the city on Saturdays and Sundays.
"That is more strenuous, otherwise we have it easier," she says.
The equestrian club had less to do, even if individual riders were on the way in the park.
"We very much hope that the equestrian quadrille will take place again next year," says Chairman Ulrike Waldhofen.
She announced that after several years of break in 2021, a Rakoczy riding tournament would take place again after several years of break in 2021.
28 Corona cases at Spanish second division side Fuenlabrada
The Spanish football second division CF Fuenlabrada is sliding deeper and deeper into the crisis because of a Corona outbreak.
Since the newcomer from near Madrid had flew to the city of A Coruña, in spite of the first cases of Corona on 20 July to a game to the city of A Coruña on July 20 July, despite the first Corona Falls on July 20, a blow follows the next.
By Sunday, 28 players or team members had been positively tested, one came to the hospital, as the club reported.
Fuenlabrada from the city of the same name, southwest of Madrid has so far had the chance to reach the promotion playoffs.
Now even the relegation to the B-group of the Second League.
The match against Deportivo La Coruña last Monday was cancelled at the last moment, the prosecutor's office determined because of a possible offense against public health, the Supreme Sports Authority CSD is considering the forced relegation of the club.
The players and other team members are quarantined at a hotel.
"Until the sixth day of quarantine, they have not received a fresh towel and gel until the sixth day of the quarantine," wrote the sports newspaper "AS".
On photos you can see how players had hung underwear and club clothes in their rooms in the hotel, after they had to wash them themselves.
The bed linen was not changed for five days.
Another problem is food.
Neither good nor sufficient, wrote "AS".
The club building, on the other hand, said that they were satisfied with the hotel.
The accusation of endangering public health was dismissed by the lawyer of the club, Javier Tebas Llanas.
The corona rules established by the Football Association, said Javier Tebas, the son of the president of the Spanish Primera Division, Javier Tebas, as reported by the news agency Europa Press and the sports newspaper "Marca".
Before the departure, there had been four infected before 19 July, but all of them were isolated and had not travelled with them.
Directly before the flight on Monday to A Coruña, all players and team members were tested again just before the flight to A Coruña.
When the team was already in A Coruña, the Corona test was positive with "five or six" other team members.
The game was canceled 60 minutes before the whistle, Tebas Llanas said.
Police must catch horses in the steam compartment
Two animals were on the road.
The police took her back to her owner.
On Sunday morning shortly before 6 o'clock, a road user reported two free-running horses on the feeder between the confluence of Donnersdorf / Steinsfeld and the motorway junction Theres.
Upon the arrival of the officers, the horses were already between the feeder and the village of Dampfach.
After the trust of the horses shortly before the steam compartment by the officials were able to gain the trust of the horses could be won by the officials shortly before the steam compartment, they had a rope carried along in the strirol car.
Professional cyclist Tony Martin: Career Continuation imaginable
Time-trial specialist Tony Martin thinks about a continuation of his career.
Frankfurt / Main - The seven-time time-trial world champion Tony Martin can well imagine continuing his cycling career.
"I am currently setting the framework conditions for how and in what form it could continue," said the 35-year-old of the "Frankfurter Allgemeine Sonntagszeitung".
Martin is currently employed for the Dutch team Jumbo-Visma team and had considered ending his career after this year.
Negotiations with his team are also about the number of race days, he said.
Or about other problems that would plague him as a family father, Martin said.
He used to get up after a fall, and the first thought was: "Quickly back on the bike.
Today I think as the father of a little daughter, I think: what would be if ".
The professional cyclist acknowledged that there are quite aspects with which he was increasingly difficult.
"But it was good for me to remember what I have about cycling and how much fun it is to me."
The time trial specialist will enter the competition at the Tour de l'Ain (5 to 9 August).
Bavaria: At least four dead on Bavaria's streets at the weekend
The beautiful weather attracts bikers to the streets in many places.
For at least three people, the tour ends with the motorcycle.
An 18-year-old pedestrian also dies.
Schönthal - In the event of accidents on Bavaria's streets, several, mostly young people, died on the weekend.
An 18-year old motorcyclist was caught by a car on Saturday near Schönthal (district of Cham) by a car that came on the opposite track.
It was unclear why the car ran on the reverse track was initially unclear.
In Upper Bavaria, a 22-year-old on his machine with a horse-drawn carriage on his machine in Upper Bavaria on Saturday.
According to the police, he was downhill at Beilngries.
In a left curve, he crashed against the carriage.
His injuries were so severe that he died in the accident.
Of the twelve inmates of the carriage, a man was seriously and a man was slightly injured, as reported by the police.
In another fatal accident, an 18-year-old died in the Upper Palatinate town of Bad Kötzting, Upper Palatinate.
He had laid down on a street on the night to Sunday and was overrun by a 42-year-old motorist.
According to the police, the 18-year-old wanted to sleep.
The driver could not brake in time.
At Schönberg (district of Freyung-Grafenau), a 57-year-old biker bounced against a car in a right curve despite full braking.
He died at the scene of the accident.
The 57-year-old driver suffered a shock, the remaining three people in the car were uninjured.
The safety of motorcyclists was discussed on Saturday by Bavaria's Minister of Transport, Kerstin Schreyer (CSU).
In a letter to the organizer of the biker protests against driving bans, Gabor Kovacs, the Minister referred to extensive investments such as underrun protection on crash barriers and the defuse of dangerous curves.
"In recent years, we have achieved a deal in recent years For the safety of motorcyclists, we have achieved a lot in recent years," said the letter.
"The number of motorized two-cyclists fell by around 28 percent compared to 2011."
Kovac tests against Frankfurt with Monaco
Frankfurt / Main (dpa) - For football coach Niko Kovac will soon be a reunion with Eintracht Frankfurt.
The eight-time French champion will be a guest on 1 August (6 pm) at the Hesse, the former club of the Croatian.
For the Bundesliga side, it is the first and only endurance test before the return leg in the Europa League against FC Basel on 6 August).
Because of the Coronavirus pandemic, the encounter is held without spectators.
"We look forward to this game.
It is always nice to come to Frankfurt and meet friends, "explained Kovac.
This is an interesting test, said the 48-year-old.
Before moving to FC Bayern München, Kovac had trained Hesse from 2016 to 2018 and led to victory in the DFB-Pokal.
"A top-class opponent like Monaco is a good test for us for the game against Basel.
Like all Frankfurers, I am looking forward to seeing Niko Kovac, "said Eintracht coach Adi Hütter.
The 50-year old Austrian had taken the succession of the Croatian at the Eintracht.
In March, the Frankfurt had lost the eighth finals against Basel in their own stadium with 0 – 3.
Nearly 50 new infections: Hof district narrowly past the lockdown
In the district of Hof, the number of known new Corona infections increased further on the weekend: from 39 on Friday and 43 on Saturday (one person is recovered and no longer fall in these statistics) to 47 on Sunday.
In addition, there is a case in the city of Hof.
The Hof area is approaching the critical mark of 50 new infections per 100,000 inhabitants in a week.
700 deaths by monsoon rain in Southeast Asia
More than 9 million people are affected by the severe floods in Southeast Asia affect more than 9 million people, especially in Bangladesh, India and Nepal.
Due to the heavy monsoon rain, a total of 700 people were killed.
In Bangladesh, the Red Crescent strives to reach the isolated people.
Whole villages are under water.
The farmers have lost their harvests.
Tank rhinoceros in national park die by landslides
In Kaziranga National Park, several of the 120 armored rhinoceros died by landslides in Kaziranga National Park.
They are under protection and considered as endangered of extinction.
This year, the floods are particularly bad this year, which attributed scientists to climate change.
According to the United Nations, Bangladesh is one of the most hit by global warming.
New apartments are empty
In the village of Cox's Bazar in the south of Bangladesh, the state has built housing for 650 people displaced by the floods.
So far, only a few have moved in.
It is difficult to bring people to Cox's Bazar.
Also the enthusiasm lasts in Grenezn.
Anyone who used to have a house, it was still so small and resembled a hut, often does not want to spend his life in a large residential block.
Many apartments are empty, but the government wants - from those who have lost their house by the floods.
60 new corona new infections in just one day in Vienna
In a 24-hour comparison, 60 new corona infections were reported in Vienna - in Lower Austria there were 22 new infections in Lower Austria.
The Landessanitätsdirektion Wien and the Medical crisis staff of the City of Vienna regularly provide regular information about the current case figures and other key figures on the COVID-19 virus: As Sunday, July 26, 2020, 8: 00 a.m., 4,840 (+ 60) positive tests are confirmed in Vienna.
The number of deaths related to the virus remains unchanged to 204.
4,090 (+ 48) people are recovered.
22 new coronavirus infections in Lower Austria
The number of coronavirus infections in Lower Austria has increased by 22 to 3,288.
According to the medical staff.
This increases the number of recovered to 2,936.
There were 247 patients suffering with CoVId-19 were 247 patients in the federal state were 247 patients in the state.
So far, 147,253 tests have been carried out so far.
105 people died in connection with the lung disease.
Argentina rejects counteroffer from creditors
The new demands could not be met, the Ministry of Economic Affairs in Buenos Aires on Saturday.
"That would not only be irresponsible, but also unfair," it said in a statement.
"While 50 percent of children in Argentina live in poverty, we cannot increase the short-term gains of our creditors."
The debt of the second largest economy in South America is no longer viable under the current conditions.
That is why Argentina calls on its private creditors to waive part of their receivables of around $66 billion (around 59 billion euros).
If there is no agreement is reached, the country will face bankruptcy.
It would be the ninth default of payment in Argentine history.
Most recently, lenders had demanded higher interest rates on government bonds and changes to some contract clauses.
However, the Argentine government, however, sticks to its last offer and is not ready for no further concessions.
Argentina is in a severe financial and economic crisis.
Inflation rate was more than 50 percent.
For the current year, experts expect a decline in economic power by around ten percent this year.
At the end of May, Argentina had not pay interest receivables of $503 million in interest receivables at the end of May and had slipped into a limited default of payment.
Professionally arrived - not privately not yet
"It's going super well" - Dr. Stefanie Kramer after her first few days in the notary in Eggenfelden.
In the end, everything went very quickly: In the middle of May, Dr. Stefanie Kramer learned that she will succeed Lutz Feller at the Eggenfelden notary office.
Six weeks later, at the beginning of July, the doctorate lawyer began work six weeks later in the beginning of July, and the normal day-to-day business is already on full swing.
"Privately, however, I still have to arrive privately," she explains in a conversation with the Rottaler Anzeiger and laughs.
Of course, the short lead time was not enough to move the centre of life from Regensburg to Eggenfelden, reports the native Dingolfing.
She is currently looking with her husband, who works as a judge at the district court in Regensburg, in search of a suitable apartment or a house in the city.
At least her husband could have been able to apply for parental leave in order to ensure the care of the two daughters (3 ½ and 1 ½ years old).
In order not to commute from Regensburg every day, she also had an overnight accommodation with her parents in Dingolfing, explains the 39-year-old.
Growing up in the neighboring district, the city of Eggenfelden has of course been a name to it for a long time.
During visits on site with her family in the past few months, she again noticed: "Eggenfelden is a really beautiful small town".
She was all the more pleased that she had made the race in the selection process for the free spot in the selection process.
Her native of Lower Bavaria also plays a central role in Dr. Stefanie Kramer's professional career, her homeland of Lower Bavaria also plays a central role in Dr. Stefanie Kramer's professional career: After studying law in Passau, she completed her legal training period and the 2nd state exam in Regensburg.
After several positions as a notary assessor, among others in Rehau and Hof in Upper Franconia, Babenhausen im Unterallgäu as well as Regensburg - during this time she also shouldered her doctorate in labour law - she took her first position as a notary in Rotthalmünster in the district of Passau in 2012.
In 2016, she went on parental leave and moved to Regensburg.
Since then, she has took over representation services in various notarial offices.
When the job in Eggenfelden was tensed due to the approaching retirement of Lutz Feller, she saw the right time for the full professional reentry, the 39-year-old explains.
Dr. Stefanie Kramer has completely taken over the team of her predecessor, who will take over the holiday representative in the notary office in the future, has completely taken over by Dr. Stefanie Kramer - and has a praise for the team of the law firm: "It is going super well!"
The fact that she can rely on established processes makes it easier for her to take care of the upcoming relocation of the private centre of life.
She has already made contact with a local institution in terms of kindergarten or nativity scenes, she has already made contact with a local institution.
And if everything works as desired, she hopes to be able to pursue her hobby here soon - and get to know the most beautiful jogging routes of the Rottal.
BVB plans for Ligastart with a maximum of 15,000 spectators
Dortmund The largest German football stadium in Dortmund will not even be filled by 20 percent at the start of the season in the event of a fan return.
"Due to the distance regulations, which is to be observed, we are planning to hold 12,000 to 15,000 spectators," said Borussia Dortmund's Managing Director Carsten Cramer to the "Tagesspiegel".
Usually, the arena in the Revierstadt holds a little more than 81,000 spectators at the Bundesliga matches.
In the ghost games caused by the Corona pandemic, the BVB had lost around four million euros per game.
The Cramer responsible at the BVB for Marketing, Digitalization and Internationalization at the BVB hopes that in addition to the normal spectators, some of the approximately 4000 seats in the hospitality area will be opened again: "It is, of course, a blow into the office if these revenue break away completely".
In view of the ongoing Corona crisis, everyone are "well advised to take a stable side".
"If many companies are not doing well and 6.8 million people in Germany alone are in short-time work in Germany alone, the need is limited to entertainment," explained Cramer.
The Dortmund marketing boss praised the BVB professionals for their salary partial waiver, which is to contribute to overcoming the crisis: "Of course, players know that their salary waiver has a different effect than if we put 100 people working in merchandising on short-time work".
Tiny wonders: early start to life with a few hundred grams
Hardly heavier than a packerl of butter, just three tablespoons of blood in his entire body: that was Gabriel when he was born - he weighed exactly 273 grams.
The boy is one of about 400 early birds that are cared for at the Graz Children ’ s Clinic in Graz.
A quarter of them weighs less than 1,500 grams, a few - like Gabriel and his brothers Raphael and Michael - are extreme light weights with not even a kilogram of birth weight.
They are so small and born so early that neither the lungs, nor intestines, nor muscles are fully developed.
Your skin is sometimes so delicate that they could damage the electrodes of an ECG.
And they are so tiny that they sometimes wear doll's clothes and mini diapers made especially for them.
But not so small that they wouldn't with voice - "and how", smiles Berndt Urlesberger.
"Even if they don't scream as loud as big babies."
When the whiteboard becomes the stage
In spite of the Corona Theater in the classroom: the whiteboard as a stage experienced the 9th classes of the St. James High School in Abtsgmünd shortly before the start of the holiday.
Actress Julia Sylvester from the Theater der Stadt Aalen presented the production "Das Heimatkleid" - via video.
Afterwards, the students were able to exchange the play and the performance with the actress and the director Winfried Tobias about the play and the performance.
The idea for the performance format from the current Corona situation was born.
Teacher Teresa Nar was happy about the enrichment of the teaching.
Even if all parties involved agreed that the direct encounter in the theatre and stage space would offer additional stimuli, the theatre also sees the potentials for contact with the schools.
"If we further improve the technical framework, this could be an interesting addition to the game," stressed director Winfried Tobias.
First round draw: TSV 1860 would meet Eintracht Frankfurt in the DFB-Pokal on Eintracht Frankfurt
If the TSV 1860 qualify for the DFB-Pokal, the lions will meet Eintracht Frankfurt in the first round.
This resulted in the draw on Sunday.
Munich - Sixty possible opponents in the first round of the DFB-Pokal.
The lions would meet Eintracht Frankfurt.
This resulted in the draw on Sunday evening at the ARD-Sportschau.
Due to the Corona pandemic, the field of participants is not yet complete due to the Corona pandemic, placeholders were used in the draw.
Due to the voluntary waiver of semifinals FC Memmingen, the TSV 1860 is already in the final of the Bavarian Too Cup (4 or 5 September).
There the lions meet either the Würzburger Kickers or Viktoria Aschaffenburg.
If second division climber Würzburg reach the final, sixty would already be firmly qualified for the first round in the DFB-Pokal.
Otherwise, the Giesinger would have to prevail in the final against Regionalligist Aschaffenburg.
The first round of the DFB Cup will take place between 11 and 14 September and thus one week before the third league start.
"Bone by the wind": film legend Olivia de Havilland is dead
The film legend and Oscar winner Olivia de Havilland is dead.
She died on Sunday in Paris at the age of 104, confirmed her spokesperson of the German Press Agency.
de Havilland was known for her role as Melanie Hamilton in the Southern epic "Vom Winde verweht" (1939).
Born in Tokyo as the child of British parents, Olivia de Havilland moved to California as a toddler.
The Austrian theatre director Max Reinhardt discovered the 19-year-old in the role of Hermia of Shakespeare's "Midsummer Night's Dream".
She was signed with the film studio Warner Brothers signed her for seven years and brought her big on the side of Eroll Flynn.
She made eight films with the heartbreaker.
In 1946, she won her first Academy Award in the lead role of "To Each His Own".
The film ran in Germany under the title "Mutterherz".
Three years later, the award for Best Actress in William Wyler's "The Heiress".
She was also recognized as a neurotic eccentric in "The Dark Mirror" and "Die Schlangengrube".
Daphne du Maurier in 1952 for the lead role in the film adaptation of her novel "My Cousin Rachel".
The play was a worldwide success.
With her longtime girlfriend Bette Davis, she played in "Lullaby for a Corpse".
He married the writer Marcus Goodrich (1946 – 1953).
In Paris, de Havilland married the journalist Pierre Paul Galante and had his daughter Gisèle with him.
This marriage also broke.
Rumors of an affair with former British Prime Minister Edward Heath were never confirmed.
"Road to Timmendorf": Beach volleyball: Thole / winders miss final at Comeback
Julius Thole and Clemens Wickler missed the final at the beach volleyball tournament "Road to Timmendorf".
At the meeting of the top teams in Düsseldorf, they lost to their national team colleates Nils Ehlers and Lars Flüggen in the semifinals with 1: 2 (17: 21, 21: 17, 19: 21).
Most recently, Thole / Wickler played at the World Tour Final in Rome in September of last year.
In the final on the Rhine, their conquerers Ehlers / Flüggen against the surprise team Lukas Pfretschner and his interim partner Steven van de Velde 0 – 2 (17: 21, 17: 21).
In addition to the show tournament, three starting places for the German championships were played at the beginning of September in Timmendorfer Strand at the beginning of September: The tickets were secured by Armin Dollinger / Simon Kulzer, Manuel Harms / Richard Peemüller and Simon Pfretschner / Milan Sievers.
Kalbitz ejection from AfD confirmed - FDP speaks of "Feigenblatt"
The exclusion of Andreas Kalbitz from the AfD is only a "fig leaf" and does not change the character of the party.
"The AfD is the parliamentary arm of the right-wing extremists in Germany.
Andreas Kalbitz is only part of the tip of the iceberg of the radicals in the AfD, "said FDP interior politician Benjamin Strasser of the news agency dpa in Berlin.
On Saturday, the Federal Arbitration Court of the AfD confirmed the exclusion of Kalbitz, which the Federal Executive Board in May.
Kalbitz is chairman of the AfD faction in the Brandenburger Landtag.
"If the AfD were to removing right-wing extremists from their party, functionaries such as Björn Höcke and his supporters would have been excluded," said Strasser.
"However, there is no political will in the AfD, because right-wing extremism is now part of the party."
Similarly, CSU Secretary General Markus Blume commented: "The fact that Andreas Kalbitz is now excluded says nothing and does not change anything," he told the "World on Sunday".
"Rather, it speaks volumes about how many frenetic supporters a right-wing extremist still has in the middle of the AfD."
Blume assumes that the AfD will end up less than five percent in the elections in the future.
"The days of the AfD in the parliaments are counted".
Kalbitz was one of the spokesmen of the officially dissolved "wing" around the Thuringian AfD state and group leader Björn Höcke.
In May, the AfD federal executive had threw Kalbitz from the party.
As the reason, he stated that Kalbitz had not declared his former membership in the now banned far-right "Heimattreuen Deutschen Jugend" (HDJ) and among the Republicans.
Kalbitz denies membership of the HDJ.
The chairman of the left-wing faction in the Brandenburg state parliament, Sebastian Walter, also emphasized that the decision of the Federal Arbitration Court does not change the character of the AfD: "The wolf has only eaten chalk.
The AfD remains a far-right party, whether with or without Kalbitz ".
Neither with this decision weaken the federal party nor the right wing.
"The maneuver of the Meuthen-Truppe is manageable.
We want to avoid further observation by the protection of the Constitution and try to get through under the radar, "said Walter.
"The AfD does not get rid of the spirits it called.
A ejection does not yet changed, "commented Erik Stohn, the Brandenburg SPD Secretary General Erik Stohn, commenting on the decision in the case of Kalbitz.
"Here, the AfD Landesverband and the group to this day to their right-wing leader to this day".
The legal dispute over the membership of Kalbitz in the AfD will continue.
On Saturday, he announced on Saturday that he would now take civil law against the decision of the Federal Arbitration Court.
North Sea wind farms deliver a good 21 percent more electricity
In the first six months of the year, the wind turbines on the German North Sea fed 11.51 terawatt hours of electricity into the grid in the first six months of the year.
This is a good 21 percent more than in the same period of the previous year, the network operator Tennet in Bayreuth.
Tennet is responsible for the transmission of the North Sea electricity to the mainland and the forwarding through the German electricity grid.
The wind turbines on the Baltic Sea, which do not belong to the grid area of Tennet, have fed another 2.22 terawatt hours (TWh) of electricity.
In total, the wind power from the North and Baltic Sea comes to 13.73 TWh, compared with a good 11.64 TWh in the first half of 2019.
The wind harvest at sea accounts for almost 19 percent of the total wind power in Germany, which is about four percentage points more than a year ago.
New wind farms ensure higher generation capacity
In addition to the wind conditions, the increased contribution of offshore wind energy results in addition to the wind conditions of higher generation capacities, because new wind farms have been connected to the grid over the past twelve months.
If the 1270 wind turbines in the North Sea all run at full power at the same time, they could generate 6.7 gigawatts of electricity.
The transmission capacity is sufficient; according to Tennet, it is 7.1 gigawatts.
By 2030, it is expected to rise to 17 gigawatts in the German North Sea by 2030.
"In Germany and the Netherlands, we are investing EUR 20 billion in the expansion of offshore grid connections in Germany and the Netherlands," said Tenniet Managing Director Tim Meyerjürgens.
In reality, wind farms cannot use their capacity at sea, but reach about 40 percent.
The previous record day this year is January 2, when the North Sea wind farms generated more than six gigawatts of electricity.
On average, the North Sea wind turbines produce about 2.5 to 3.0 gigawatts of electricity, which corresponds to three to four nuclear power plants.
This could provide almost seven million households.
Art "Skirmish" - an exhibition by the Leipzig artist Christian Bold in the gallery of the Gmünder Kunstverein.
This was almost a small anniversary celebration for the 130.
Birthday of the Gmünder Kunstverein: The exhibition opening "Skirmish" with works by the Leipzig artist Christian Bold blew up the usual frame after the Corona break.
Much more art lovers than usual followed the dialogue between the artist and the chairman of the Kunstverein, Professor Dr. Klaus Ripper.
The musical equivalent was provided by the band "Defenders of the Universe" on the southern Kornhausplatz.
To the north of the gallery was the association "Sandtogether" was involved to the north of the gallery.
Freital: Windbergfest cancelled due to Corona
The Windbergfest will not take place this year.
The city of Freital cancelled the three-day festival, which was planned in September.
In recent years, more than 30,000 people had attended the festival.
"We truly did not made this decision easy and - aware of how difficult it is economically for the participants - until the last minute," said Lord Mayor Uwe Rumberg (non-party).
"But in the end, we are responsible for the health of many thousands of people."
Because if tens of thousands had flocked to the festival grounds and into the marquee, minimum distances, hygiene regulations as well as contact tracking would not have been met in accordance with the current Coronas protection regulation could not have been observed.
Or the restrictions would have been so strong that not much of a folk festival.
In addition, the organisational and monitoring effort would increase disproportionately by many times disproportionately.
Rumberg retired next year.
Then the city of Freital celebrates its 100th anniversary with the Winterbergfest from 7 to 9 May 2021 and the Day of the Saxons from 10 to 12 September 2021.
Dressage Olympic champion Werth in Achleiten not to beat
Achleiten - The six-time Olympic champion Isabell Werth was the outstanding rider in the dressage tournament in Achleiten, Austria.
The 51-year-old from Rheinberg came to four victories on the weekend at four starts.
After winning a Grand Prix at the prelude with Weihegold and Quantaz, she was not beaten in the Grand Prix Special and in the freestyle.
On the 15-year-old mare Weihegold, Werth prevailed the Austrian Victoria Max-Theurer on Abegglen.
Also in the freestyle, the Germans were on Quantaz on Saturday, clearly in front of their 34-year-old student Victoria Max-Theurer.
Werths Siegerpferd Quantaz belongs to Max-Theurer.
The most successful dressage rider in the world is supposed to establish the ten-year-old stallion in the Grand Prix.
For Quantaz, it was the first freestyle ever.
Already at the first tournament in Achleiten three weeks ago, Werth had won all important four exams at the first tournament in Achleiten three weeks ago.
The last of the three international tournaments is scheduled for 14 to 16 August.
More air traffic controllers in Worms
The Worms University continues into the skies: The "DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung" donates a professorship for "Air Traffic Management".
A corresponding contract between the university and the DFS has now been signed in Worms.
The contract was initially signed for three years and will start in 2021.
The professorship, it is possible to enable the start of the studies not only in the summer but also in the winter semester.
This allows twice as many students can be trained as before.
At the same time, the capacities are evenly utilized both at the university as well as at the air traffic control academy of DFS.
The DFS will advise the university on the establishment and occupation of the professorship.
Represented at the university since 2019
Since the summer semester 2019, the first students have been studying in Air Traffic Management as part of their training as air traffic controllers at Worms University of Applied Sciences.
This year, nine students started this year.
So far, the experience of the DFS has been very positive, the achievements of the students are outstanding.
The combination of studies and pilot training makes a major contribution to increasing the attractiveness of the pilot profession.
"In these times, the promotion is not easy for us.
However, we expect air traffic to recover and grow again in the long term.
In order to be able to fulfil our legal mission in the future, we need highly qualified personnel, "says Professor Klaus-Dieter Scheurle, Chairman of DFS at the signing of the contract.
"For DFS, the endowed professorship is a future-proof investment that will provide air traffic controllers with a broad, cross-disciplinary knowledge base for air traffic controllers in the long term.
We therefore continue our good cooperation with the university and at the same time underlining our attractiveness as an employer. "
Professor Dr. Jens Hermsdorf, President of Worms University of Applied Sciences, underlines: "The endowed professorship forms an important bridge between science and business.
With it, we would like to build on the already existing cooperation with DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung as a practice partner for the dual bachelor's degree programme in Air Traffic Management. "
The trust of German Air Traffic Control is both motivation and commitment for Worms University of Applied Sciences to further expand its teaching and research skills in the fields of the future of air transport.
In use for the air traffic controllers of tomorrow, the university can set very special highlights and innovative priorities for its students with the first endowed professorship for a dual course of study, the university can set very special highlights and innovative priorities for its students.
Dr. Denis Alt, State Secretary at the Ministry of Science, Education and Culture, emphasizes: "The Worms University of Applied Sciences has a unique selling point in Rhineland-Palatinate.
Today's signing of the cooperation agreement strengthens the profile of the university ".
Rescue helicopicopter lands on the A 45
The A 45 motorway was fully closed on Saturday afternoon in the direction of Aschaffenburg, because after a traffic accident, the rescue helicopter was in operation after a traffic accident.
A 76-year-old drove straight ahead with a Ford at around 12.40 p.m. at the Alzenau-Mitte exit in the curve and landed on the guardrail.
The impact triggered the front airbags, the driver suffered minor injuries on the face and had to be taken to a hospital for treatment.
The injuries of the 72-year-old passenger were provided by the emergency doctor and the patient was then flown to a hospital with the rescue helicopter to a hospital.
However, the police assume that there is no danger to life.
The damaged vehicle, which caused a damage of about 2000 euros, had to be towed.
Heil wants to test other industries after meat industry
The Corona crisis brought to light the conditions in parts of the meat industry.
Legislative tightening are imminent.
But are they right - and will it stick with it?
Federal Labour Minister Hubertus Heil (SPD) wants to review other sectors according to the now planned strict regulations against maladministration in the meat industry.
"We will look at the industry for industry and then take appropriate measures for the respective industry if necessary," said Heil of the German Press Agency in Berlin.
Germany's employers already warn against restricting work contracts in general.
After the mass corona outbreak at the meat giant Tönnies in North Rhine-Westphalia, the Federal Cabinet wants to pass a law of salvation this Wednesday.
Large slaughtereries should no longer be allowed to use foreign personnel in slaughter, dismantling and meat processing.
For this purpose, the use of works contract and temporary workers is to be banned there.
Employer President Ingo Kramer, the dpa said: "Finger away from a general restriction of work contracts and provision of workers if you don't want to completely strangle the economy completely".
For example, work contracts are, for example, for large areas of the handicraft, the construction industry and plant engineering, for example, are the basis for their value creation at the customer.
"The misconduct of individuals cannot destroy such an important instrument".
Heil assured: "My goal is not to prohibit work contracts everywhere in the German economy."
Work contracts are useful.
"When an industrial company instructs a craftsman to install a safety system, this is a very normal work contract."
The German meat industry considers a ban on work contracts and temporary work in its industry alone is unconstitutional.
It is not explainable why the portioning and packaging of cheese should be subject to different labour law should be applied in the future, according to a statement on the legislative project, as reported by the "Neue Osnabrücker Zeitung" (Saturday) reports.
If a ban, the consumer price would rise by 10 to 20 percent per kilo per product.
Many Eastern European employees from works contract companies worked in the industry 16 hours a day according to the results of an audit of the North Rhine-Westphalia.
Often they did not have a break.
Wages was withheld for protective equipment or rent.
It was also noted that the situation in the housing of workers was often miserable.
Heil said that a relatively sharp law came into force for the meat industry in 2017.
However, these were bypassed by "tricky constructions" these have been bypassed by "tricky constructions.
"Now we need to be fundamentally tidy up."
The politician announced: "In the Occupational Safety Act, which we want to adopt in the cabinet at the end of July, are also measures that not only affect the meat industry - for example, higher occupational health and safety or clear criteria for community shelters".
The draft to the dpa includes amendments to the law on the protection of labour rights in the meat industry as well as the Occupational Health and Safety Act.
Brandenburg's Consumer Protection Minister Ursula Nonnemacher (Greens) considers more intensive controls are necessary.
"I would like to be able to make even more controls in many areas of supervision: food controls, animal welfare, all sorts of things, for example, animal transport," said Nonnemacher on Sunday in the RBB programme "Brandenburg aktuell".
However, for more checks, however, also requires more staff positions are also needed for more controls.
Three deaths in the crash of ultralight aircraft in Germany
According to the police, three people died when the crash of an ultralight aircraft crash on an apartment building in Wesel in the German state of North Rhine-Westphalia.
A child was slightly injured.
Two other people were rescued in the misfortune, said a spokesman of the Wesel spokesman.
A parachute was found at the scene of the accident, according to the police.
The "Rheinische Post" reported, citing eyewitnesses that before the crash, the aircraft had crashed with a hot air balloon before the crash.
The house is a single or two-family house.
No further details were not known.
eviction of Frankfurt ’ s Opernplatz run peacefully
One week after the riots in Frankfurt, the eviction of the Opera Square went peacefully on the night of Sunday.
A few dozen people stayed on the square, but left it at 1: 00 a.m. before the beginning of the curfew at 1 o'clock before the curfew.
The police had been in action since the early evening with numerous officials since the early evening, with a larger police force was to be seen throughout the city.
For the first time this weekend from midnight, a maintenance ban was applied for the Opera Square was applied for the first time this weekend from midnight, on which riots had occurred a week ago.
Policemen had been attacked with bottles out of the crowd of celebrating.
At least five officers were injured and several police vehicles were damaged.
The night to Saturday had also remained quiet.
Car beats: Young woman seriously injured in an accident on Bundesstraße 83 at Hofgeismar
In the event of an accident between Schöneberg and Hümme, a 21-year-old suffered serious injuries on Sunday at around 13.25 o'clock in an accident between Schöneberg and Hümme on Sunday.
She was taken to the Klinikum Kassel.
With thermal imaging cameras, the fire brigade looked for potential passengers with thermal imaging cameras.
According to the police, according to the police, the woman was driving on Bundesstraße 83 in the direction of her place of residence Hümme, when her car came from the road for previously unexplained reason and overturned several times.
In order to save the injured, the fire brigade had to cut the roof of the car.
Since it was unclear whether anyone was still in the vehicle, the adjacent corn field was searched from the rotary ladder with a thermal imager.
The Drohnenstaffel from Warburg, which also works with thermal imaging cameras, had also been ordered for the search for people.
However, the volunteers, however, did not find anyone between the tall maize plants.
The seriously injured was taken by the ambulance to the Kasseler Klinikum.
Nearly 50 volunteers of the Hofgeismar, Hümme and Schöneberg were on site.
The federal road was closed for two hours because of the accident.
Juventus Turin champions in Italy
Turin - After a redeeming goal by Cristiano Ronaldo, record champion Juventus Turin has secured the Italian championship for the ninth time in series.
The team around the five-time world footballer made the 36th Scudetto of the club's history with a 2-0 (1: 0) on Sunday evening in the home game against Sampdoria Genoa.
Ronaldo scored 1 – 0 before the half.
With 83 points, Turin, which, without the recently injured ex-international player Sami Khedira two days before the end of the season of Serie A.
The Inter Milan is seven points behind.
Juventus was harmless in the first half, despite optical superiority, Juventus in the first half, Juventus was harmless, then Ronaldo met with the last action after a free kick with the last action.
The 35-year-old used Miralem Pjanic was used by the 35-year-old from the penalty limit boundary directly with a flat shot (45. + 7) from the Miralem Pjanic.
Against the now more offensive guests, Ronaldo was also involved in the 2 – 0, after his shot, Federico Bernardeschi (67th) dusted.
This ensured the lackluster, but decisive success.
The fououl meter shot to the bar in the 89th minute shot to the bar, only Ronaldo himself with a view to the goalhunter classification.
"It's complicated to stay mentally and physically for 90 minutes.
The games are strange, and the momentum changes very slightly, "said coach Maurizio Sarri after the 1: 2 at Udinese Calcio on Thursday.
Especially the mental exhaustion of his players is great, said the Juve coach.
Due to the defeat, the Turinians had not yet been able to make the championship.
The ultimately reassuring advantage at the top of the table was owed to Juve was mainly due to the weakness of the competitors.
In the eleven games before the match on Sunday, the Sarar team won only five victories in the eleven games before the match on Sunday.
Whether Ronaldo becomes a goalscorer king is questionable.
Because while the Portuguese superstar has scored 31 goals so far, the former Dortmund Ciro Immobile, after his pack of three at the 5-1 (1: 1) of the standings fourth Lazio Rome at Hellas Verona, Ciro Immobile has already scored 34 goals in his account at Hellas Verona - as many as Robert Lewandowski contributed to the title win of FC Bayern.
The record in Italy is set by Juve pro Gonzalo Higuaín holds the record in Italy.
In the 2015 / 2016 season, the Argentinian scored 36 goals for SSC Naples in the 2015 / 2016 season.
In August, the next title chance is waiting for the "Old Lady" of Italian football.
Juventus is in the eighth finals of the Champions League, but on 7 August against Olympique Lyon against Olympique Lyon to reach the final tournament in Lisbon.
In the next knockout round, Real Madrid or Manchester City.
Baden-Württemberg: More than 250 illegal car races
Stuttgart - Despite all threatened penalties and court judgments, motorists continue to give gas in countless illegal races on the streets of Baden-Württemberg: In the past year and the first four months of this year, the police in the southwest have already registered more than 250 illegal car races last year and the first four months of this year.
There are no comparison values for the years before, but the Raser are increasingly doing work for the judicial authorities: In 2018 the public prosecutor's offices between Konstanz and Mannheim, a total of 155 investigation proceedings were conducted in 2018 for illegal races in 2018, one year later there were already 252 and in the current year until the beginning of June already 151.
The races were less about organized events, as the response of the Ministry of the Interior to a request from the Landtags-SPD.
In most cases, the drivers spontaneously competed against each other spontaneously or they had escaped from the police - this, too, is reported as an illegal race.
At the wheel were mainly German men between the ages of 18 and 60 years of age.
113 fines - 15 times imprisonment
Only in comparatively few cases are the Raser are caught and also asked to checkout: According to the Ministry of the Interior, a total of 113 fines have been imposed since 2018 and 15 prison sentences have been imposed.
However, there is no evidence that the number of illegal car races is actually increasing.
Rather, other motorists reacted more sensitive than before due to the large number of tragic accidents and processes of recent years, other motorists reacted more sensitively than in the past, and indicated more frequently, said a ministerial spokesman said.
Particularly popular with Rasern is the Autobahn 8 is particularly popular with Rasern. Again and again, motorists are braking the traffic there in order to get space and to use the free track for a race.
Last August, a dozen riders were caught near Kirchheim unter Teck, three months earlier there were even 18 riders on the A8 near Merklingen.
A81 is the most popular "race track"
On the A81, the police register even more races on the A81 than on any other federal highway.
With a speed limit is used to slow down the racers on the particularly affected section between Engen and Geisingen.
The mostly high-priced and mudd-up sports and luxury bodies often have Swiss license plates, because the drivers dodge to a lawn to Germany because of the high penalties for too fast driving and car racing in the neighbouring country.
For the SPD, the speed limit must not be reduced to a few distances: "With a general speed limit of 130 kilometers per hour, we would solve this problem on motorways," says Martin Rivoir, the transport expert of the SPD parliamentary group.
"The inhibition threshold for Raser would be significantly higher if you were not here and there with 200 kilometers per hour and more."
Rivoir considers less of enlightenment or image campaigns: "Anyone who in such a way beyond all the rules in such a way and not only jeopardizes not only their own lives, but also the lives of other road users, is hardly attainable with reason."
ADAC calls for stronger action of the police
The ADAC, on the other hand, is not enough: "We assume that Raser will not be deterred by the speed limits," says Holger Bach, Head of Transport and Environment at the ADAC Württemberg.
It calls for additional and also tougher controls on the affected routes.
The high-touring measure of strength becomes more painful and consequous seriousness: Since January 2019 and until April 2020, three people have been killed in the races nationwide since January 2019 and April 2020, two of them were uninvolved in a night-time crash in Stuttgart's city centre and one in Gerlingen.
In November, two young men are said to have a car race in November.
One of the vehicles came off the road, crashed against a garden wall and remained on the side, the 18-year-old passenger died.
21 more people were injured in the races of the past two years.
However, sharper penalties are not necessary, according to Minister of the Interior, Thomas Strobl, more severe penalties are not necessary: "Legislature's need for action in order to harder sanction illegal vehicle races harder is not seen," says the paper of the Ministry of the Interior.
Blue light of 23 July: Thirsty burglarar steals drinks from snack
Rohrdorf: A man broke into a snack on Thursday in Rohrdorf (Calw district) and stole drinks and cash.
A witness heard sounds in the valley road and ran in the direction of the snack.
There he noticed a man using drinks on the fridge and then left the snack through a previously opened entrance door.
The perpetrator fled to the meadows behind the snack.
According to the police, the burglar, according to the police, the burglarar also served at a cash office and stole cash in the low three-digit range.
The crime suspect is described as follows: He is about 1.75 to 1.80 meters tall and of strong stature.
In fact, he wore a black hoodie, black trousers and light shoes.
The police received further witnesses are received by the police.
Ackermann sprints to victory on the final stage at Sibiu Tour
Professional cyclist Pascal Ackermann won his second day victory on the final stage of the 10th Sibiu Tour.
The 26-year-old Palatine from the team Bora-hansgrohe prevailed in the mass sprint on the 109-kilometer long section with the start and finish in Sibiu, after winning a stage on Saturday.
There were the season victories three and four for Ackermann.
In the overall standings, his Austrian team mate Gregor Mühlberger prevailed in the overall classification.
In the morning, the 26-year-old had confidently decided the mountain time trial in the morning and thus took the lead in the classification.
Only 104 riders had competed to the final stage in the evening.
No less than 18 starters had fallen victim to the time limit.
"I am really happy to start the season restart with a victory," Ackermann explained after his success on Saturday.
"The sprint was really hectic," said the 26-year-old.
300 meters before the finish, he simply put on his sprint 300 meters before the finish, "and it worked out perfectly".
According to the rules of the World Federation UCI, a corona test was conducted for all race participants and their companions six days before the start of the race.
During the entire tour, drivers and carers were separated from the organizing team and the media in isolated hygiene bubbles were separated from the organizing team as well as from the media in isolated hygiene bubbles.
Viewers at the start and finish were not allowed.
Control center gave instruction for lay resuscitation
Düsseldorf - Tragic accident on Sunday afternoon in Düsseldorf-Garath.
In an apartment house, a child (4) was suddenly lifeless in the water while bathing.
According to the fire brigade, the emergency call arrived at shortly before 1 o'clock.
"A control center planner immediately gave instructions for lay resuscitation," said a fire spokesman to BILD.
The incoming rescue forces took over the revival measures a short time later.
The child, who is in danger of life, was transported to the university clinic under resuscitation.
It is unclear why it happened is unclear.
The police have routinely started the investigation into the course of the accident.
The firefighter: "We start from a tragic accident in the apartment".
Nuremberg: Unapproved tuning meeting - police intervenes, 700 vehicles and around 1100 people
Hundreds of cars and more than 1000 people took part in a "tuning meeting" in the parking lot of a furniture store.
The police made their announcement that they would increasingly control such events.
A big tuning meeting was held on Saturday evening (25 July 2020) in Nürnberger Südstadt.
Several hundred vehicles were involved.
According to the police in Middle Franconia, the Nuremberg traffic police had found an increased number of vehicles in the area of a large parking lot on Ingolstädter Strasse.
As a result, the police carried out a number of vehicle checks.
Only recently, the police announced that they wanted to take more action against so-called autoposers.
Illegal tuning meeting in Nuremberg: only a small part of the "scene"
The officials counted at the top were a good 700 vehicles and about 1100 people, accounted to the police.
Of this, however, only a small part of those present of the "Autoposer" and tuning scene.
Apparently, most of the relevant scene followed the appeal of the police.
Based on the local vehicles and people, it can be assumed that these were predominantly onlookers.
In addition, the overwhelming majority of those present adherlied to the applicable infection protection regulations, in particular the observance of the minimum distance and the wearing of a worth-nasal protection.
The control measures carried out on the site were completed at 1: 00 a.m.
In total, the officials noticed such structural changes in 10 vehicles that the operating permit had extinguished.
Four of these vehicles had to be ensured.
No car racing
There were no illegal car racing.
"The police headquarters of Middle Franconia will continue to keep an eye on the events and will continue to carry out increased control measures, also in connection with the advent of speclookers," it said.
The agency News5 spoke to Jürgen Schrödinger from the involved towing company: "They all have beautiful rims, which we must not scratch them," says Schrödinger.
Special ribbons would be used.
Also because the cars are wider, the company has to make sure not to do any damage.
"The young people are supposed to get their cars back without prejudice."
Figures of the employment agency: 900 suspicion cases of abuse in short-time work
Berlin - The Federal Employment Agency (BA), according to its own statement, around 900 suspicion cases of misuse of short-time worker allowance.
"This is extremely little for more than 880,000 companies that reported short-time work," said Daniel Terzenbach, responsible for the operating business, Daniel Terzenbach of the "Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung".
When at the beginning of the Corona crisis, when a large number of companies suddenly applied for short-time work at the beginning of the Corona crisis, the BA had to react quickly.
Usually, the exam lasts up to three weeks.
"So much time was not available to us in this hot phase.
All the more closely we will take a closer look at the final bills.
There will certainly be a lot to follow.
We are not naive and have a long breath. "
Indications of abuse would often come from the affected employees or trade unions.
In addition, the BA uses analysis software to detect abuse patterns.
According to Terzenbach, the BA is preparing for a possible wave of insolvency in the autumn.
"Will there be significantly more insolvencies than in the previous year?
The assessments are divided, but we arm ourselves in the event of the case and are already training our employees in the employment agencies to process applications for insolvency money ".
The figures are still inconspicuous, said Terzenbach.
World Heritage in Potsdam: Party dissolved in the New Garden
Potsdam - On Friday evening, about 40 young people celebrated a party in the Neuer Garten.
The collection was dissolved at 8.48 by the regional drivers of the Stiftung Preußische Schlösser und Gärten (SPSG), informed the foundation on PNN request.
The young people left the park.
On Saturday evening, some young people would have played rugby in the New Garden.
The meadow had been cleared by district drivers, said SPSG spokesman Frank Kallensee on Sunday.
Time and again there are illegal celebrations in the parks
In the parks of the Foundation, there are again and again accumulations in which the distance and hygiene rules COVID-19 Ordinance are not observed.
At the end of June, there was a celebration with about 300 people in the Babelsberg Park, a week later, about 150 people celebrated in the New Garden.
Even without corona order, the parks are closed in the fall of dark.
Storage on the meadows is prohibited according to the park regulations, there are only few exceptions.
The Foundation has been complaining that visitors are leaving more and more garbage and destroy protected biotopes.
In Berlin, illegal park parties have reached a different dimension.
In the Hasenheide in the district of Neukölln, 5000 people celebrated an illegal techno party in the Hasenheide in Neukölln district.
The event was dissolved by the police.
Austria: Mass tests after Corona outbreak in tourist resort
With hundreds of tests, authorities have responded to a corona outbreak in the popular Upper Austrian tourist town of St. Wolfgang.
The number of confirmed cases increased to 48, as reported by the state authorities in Linz.
More than 100 results in the evening.
According to this, many of the infected are young interns in tourism companies, but at least one holiday guest has been tested positively.
Residents, guests and tourism staff were asked to stay in their accommodation on Saturday evening.
The curfew was set at 11 o'clock.
"There are cancellations and cancellations" of bookings, said the head of the tourism association Wolfgangsee, Hans Wieser, the dpa.
Some guests left prematurely.
St. Wolfgang is the most important tourist resort in Upper Austria, with more than 400,000 nights last year.
In a normal season, around one third of the guests are German.
On Friday, the first infections became publicly known on Friday.
On Saturday, the head of the district office, Alois Lanz, defended the behaviour of the interns who had celebrated in several venues and might have been infected there.
"We all liked to do that in our youth," he told the radio station Ö1.
However, two bars were closed on Friday to prevent further infections.
The Tourism Board launched an information campaign to sensitize young employees of the dangers of Covid-19.
From Saturday, hundreds of employees, holidaymakers and locals were tested.
In addition, all guests who were in St. Wolfgang on 15 July.
The eruption evokes memories of the Austrian ski and party resort of Ischgl in Tyrol, which in the early phase of the pandemic, was a centre of the Corona spread all over Europe in the early phase of the pandemic.
In total, more than 1500 people in Austria are currently infected with the virus.
The focus of the new infections are Vienna and Upper Austria.
Premier League: Man United and Chelsea qualify for Champions League
London (dpa) - English football record holder Manchester United returns to the Champions League after a year of absence.
The Red Devils secured third place in the last day of the Premier League, the Red Devils secured third place with a 2 – 0 (0 – 0) against direct rival Leicester City on the last day of the Premier League.
The foxes must now be satisfied with the Europa League, because FC Chelsea still moved by and qualified for the top league.
In the fight against the descent, Aston Villa was allowed to cheer.
Manchester United led by Bruno Fernandes (71st minute).
After a red card for Leicester City, Jesse Lingard (90th + 8).
Chelsea, opponent of FC Bayern in the Champions League quarter-finals, won 2 – 0 Wolverhampton Wanderers thanks to Mason Mount (45. + 1) and Olivier Giroud (45. + 4), 2 – 0 (2 – 0) against the Wolverhampton Wanderers.
"That means a lot to me," said coach Frank Lampard, who in his first season as a Chelsea coach in the final of the FA Cup against Arsenal in his first season as a Chelsea coach.
Tottenham Hotspur also benefited from Chelsea's win over Wolverhampton also benefited Tottenham Hotspur, who passed past the Wolves with a lean 1 – 1 (1 – 0) at Crystal Palace and finished sixth in the Europa League.
Aston Villa won the duel with Watford and AFC Bournemouth, but had to tremble for class preservation at West Ham United.
The late leadership of Jack Grealish (84th) was immediately out by Andrei Yarmolenko (85.).
The 1 – 1 (0 – 0) because Watford lost 2 – 3 (1 – 3) to Arsenal.
The club, who shot three coaches in the season, relegated after five years.
Just like Bournemouth, who couldn't save itself by a 3: 1 (2: 1) at FC Everton.
In the end, a point was missing.
FC Liverpool, who has been an English champions since the end of June, secured a club record with a 3 – 1 (1 – 1) victory at Newcastle United.
99 meters are the highest value the Reds have ever achieved in a football season.
Coach Jürgen Klopp and his team missed the points record in English football was narrowly missed by coach Jürgen Klopp and his team only narrowly missed the points record in English football.
The best record holds Manchester City with 100 points in the 2017 – 18 season.
After the Newcastle lead in the first minute, Virgil van Dijk (38th), Divock Origi (59th) and Sadio Mané (89th) made the game on Sunday for Liverpool.
"It was an extraordinary season for this wonderful club," said goalscorer van Dijk after the match, "that should spur us to defend the title.
It will be difficult ".
In the end, the Premier League bosses will be satisfied in the end.
Due to the Coronavirus crisis, the football operations in England from 13 March to 17 June due to the Coronavirus crisis.
In the meantime, premature demolition or cancellation of the rest of the games on neutral ground.
However, the season could be played without special occurrences - but as in Germany without spectators in the stadiums.
Arrest and Violence in Demonstrations Against Netanyahu
The protests in Israel against the head of government Netanyahu are becoming more and more violent.
At the night, there were violent clashes at the night.
On the night of Sunday, the Israeli police forcibly went in Jerusalem on the night of Sunday in Jerusalem against participants in a demonstration against the right-wing conservative head of government, Binyamin Netanyahu.
Twelve people were arrested for participating in unrest, police spokesman Micky Rosenfeld.
The police used water cannons to dissolve the rally.
In total, according to media reports, on Saturday evening, around 6,000 people had gathered near Netanyahu's official office on Saturday evening.
They protested against unemployment, corruption and Netanyahu's handling of the Corona crisis.
The protesters beat drums, blew in horns and called for Netanyahu to resign.
Participants in a counterdemonstration who supported Netanyahu were also arrested, reported the news page "ynet".
People also demonstrated in many other places in Israel, including in front of the private villa of the head of government in the coastal city of Caesarea and in a park in Tel Aviv.
A man was arrested near Tel Aviv for suspicion of spraying pepper spray on demonstrators on the side of the road from a moving car.
Another man was arrested after a knife attack on a demonstrator in the south of the country.
The demonstrator was slightly injured at the neck.
In Jerusalem and Tel Aviv, there have been several demonstrations against Netanyahu in Jerusalem and Tel Aviv.
The rallies accompany the corruption process against the head of government.
Netanyahu was also criticized for his handling of the Corona crisis.
Among other things, he is presented, among other things, premature loosening and a lack of preparation for a second wave of corona wave.
The Corona crisis has increased hard to the country ’ s economy.
The unemployment rate was more than 20 percent.
The number of new infections with the coronavirus in Israel recently increased to ever new record levels.
Accident at Ahlen (NRW) - Transporter kracht auf Auto - neun Verinjured - Ruhrgebiet - Bild.de
Ahlen - A rear-end collision resulted for nine light injuries on Saturday afternoon on the B58 near Ahlen on Saturday afternoon.
A motorist with her two children (3, 5) were on the way in the direction of Beckum.
The police: "Probably she had suddenly slowed her down because she wanted to turn off."
The driver of a Mercedes transporter who drove behind her must have seen this too late.
He crashed in the back of the car.
In the accident, three inmates in the car and six in the transporter were slightly injured.
Several ambulances took her to a nearby hospital.
North Korea locks border city after Corona suspicion
North Korea has seen a "shining success" in its own measures to defend the coronavirus as a "shining success".
For the first time the country reports for the first time on a case of suspicion for the first time.
Because of the first official Corona suspicion in the country, North Korea has completely sealed a city in fear of a catastrophe.
Despite the strictest epidemiological defenses in the past six months, "the malignant virus may have been introduced into the country," the state media reported.
The state of emergency was imposed for the region around the border town of Kaesong.
The communist leadership declared the highest level of alert.
If the suspicion is confirmed, it would be the first official infection with Sars-CoV-2 in the isolated country.
According to own reports, North Korea had not registered a single infection and described its defenses as a "luminous success".
The data were quested abroad.
The symptoms of the disease were reportedly identified by a "outlier" who illegally crossed the military demarcation line between South and North Korea on July 19.
The person had deed to South Korea three years ago and has now returned across the border.
There was no confirmation from South Korea for the border crossing within the four kilometres wide and largely mined military buffer zone, there was no confirmation from South Korea.
However, according to reports from the national news agency Yonhap, the possibility of an illegal border crossing to North Korea as high according to the national news agency Yonhap.
Investigations of a number of the people.
According to Saturday, North Korea claims that on Saturday because of the suspicion, an emergency meeting of the Politburo, chaired by leader Kim Jong Un, on Saturday because of the suspicion.
The "dangerous situation in Kaesong could trigger a deadly and destructive catastrophe".
Kim had already ordered on Friday as a preventive measure "to" completely block Kaesong and isolate each district and the region from others, "he continued.
The data subject, as well as all people in Kaesong who had contact with her, were quarantined.
The central military commission of the party is to investigate the "case of outbreak" as well as the behaviour of the responsible military unit and, if necessary, impose a severe punishment.
It is estimated that there is estimated to be about 300,000 people live in Kaesong.
Suspense before Council meeting: City East and noise protection are still under discussion before a big summer break
"In addition to environmental issues, the committee members will, among other things, on the development plan for the major project Innenstadtentwicklung-Ost," it is rather casually stated in the middle section of the city's press release on the next Municipal Council Meeting on Tuesday, July 28, at 4.30 p.m. in the Great Hall of the CongressCenter Pforzheim.
However, the upgraation of the eastern city, however, is controversial until the end.
The majorities for this are scarce, most recently in individual committees, depending on the presence.
An appeal from the economy (construction, real estate, trade and IT), the project developed out of the citizenship and then by the administration and municipal council after almost ten years of preparation, criticized by project opponents Reinhard Klein criticized as a "non-parliamentary opposition", "unsuspecting", "speculation", "denigration" and "conscious false statements".
"Everyone think they know it better," says Klein, who has been the only representative of the Pforzheim citizens list for a year.
In fact, after reading the treaties, he is in this position: "I know what I'm talking about".
The exit of the city cheaper, the Technical City Hall, contrary to statements by the city administration, according to grants, of whose existence of which Klein is convinced to rehabilitate for 8.5 million euros.
The city will develop quite differently than the town hall and on the part of the proponents of the economy.
Designing the city by its own power and not an investor: That is his plan B. One day after Klein, the FDP / FW / UB / LED Group, which also rejects the project, presented an alternative concept.
It also provides for the refurbishment of the Technical Town Hall, the open maintenance of the Schloßberg, the rental of the former valley for administrative areas and a small-scale downtown reorganization with local carriers.
Environmental issues play a central role
In addition, environmental issues will play a central role.
Among other things, the local council will vote on the noise action plan.
This includes various measures to protect the population of Pforzheim population from health noise pollution, caused by road traffic, including often tempo reduction.
In a press release, the local transport club Germany welcomes the widespread introduction of Tempo 30. However, the political leaders in the city are not innocent of the fact that this must happen in this way, because they only contributed to the massive increase in car traffic and noise by neglecting scheduled bus traffic with thinned cycles and little commitment to cycling, they have only contributed to the massive increase in car traffic and thus the noise, according to the VCD.
The municipal council agrees on the participation of the city of the energy and energy agency Pforzheim / Enzkreis.
In addition, the agenda of the agenda is the accession to the climate protection pact of the state of Baden-WÃ1 ⁄ 4rttemberg, the reestablishment of parental contributions in the municipal day care facilities and the application for inclusion in the Smart City funding of the federal government.
Citizens are welcome, but must take Corona protection measures.
Tim Zimmermann starts into the new season with a lot of delay
With almost half a year delay, Tim Zimmermann will start his first season in the ADAC GT Masters on July 31st.
Before the league of super sports cars can start regular operation, the first test drives were now available.
For Zimmermann, it was mainly about getting to know his Lamborghini Huracan GT3.
For a long time, the Corona crisis has prevented for a long time prevented Tim Zimmermann from starting his first business trip in the new Lamborghini Huracan from Grasser Racing.
This was now possible under special hygiene conditions.
The 23-year-old Langenargener made his first laps on the Lausitzring and was able to get used to his debut in the GT3 car.
"There are already a few things that are different from the pre-season Porsche," says Zimmermann.
"With the ABS, for example, you have to go into the curves, for example.
But it was really a lot of fun. "
Zimmermann also had fun with Steijn Schothorst, with whom he will share his orange sports car in the GT Masters.
The Dutch has already experienced in GT sports in spite of his only 25 years, the Dutch is already experienced in GT sports and was able to help his new teammate in many things.
"I'm not a beginner in motorsport, but every new series also brings new challenges," says Zimmermann.
"Steijn and I are dazzling and we made enormous progress at the Lausitzring from session to session at the Lausitzring."
Right there - at the Lausitzring - the GT Masters will also carry out its first race.
From 31 July, the 33 super sports cars will race through Lusatia.
Zimmermann, who is one of 15 newcomers, knows the track.
In 2015, he was a guest at the Motodrom.
"It worked quickly and I had to get used to the track," says Zimmermann, who starts for the Friedrichshafener Renngemeinschaft Graf Zeppelin.
"The Lausitzring has many fast passages that you have to hit optimally in order to be fast".
How fast Zimmermann really is, that turns out in two weeks.
"Of course, the teams score a little in the tests," he says.
"Ultimately, we are very satisfied and look forward to the first weekend at the Lausitzring".
The race in Brandenburg will be the prelude of a densely packed calendar.
There are seven races are scheduled until the beginning of November.
The current state is that no spectators will be admitted - but there is a prominent guest.
In the middle of August at the Nürburgring in mid-August, ex-Formula One driver Niko Hülkenberg will grab the GT steering wheel in mid-August at the Nürburgring.
British Transport Minister coldly caught by quarantine decision
According to press reports, the British government ’ s decision to quarantine Spanish holidaymakers in quarantine for two weeks after their return for two weeks after their return has coldly caught the country ’ s Minister of Transport, according to press reports.
Accordingly, Grant Shapps is currently on holiday in Spain, while his colleagues decided the measure at home on Saturday.
Because of the Corona numbers in Spain, the London cabinet cancelled the country from the list of countries from which it are allowed to enter the country without quarantine requirements is possible.
The new regulation will apply from today, Sunday, so Shapps will also have to quarantine after his return to quarantine.
In Austria, the government has also imposed quarantine measures for returnees.
But the regulation applies to those who are just on the holiday date, only from Saturday, 1 August, and has not been introduced overnight.
By the way, Spain in Austria, by the way, Spain is regarded as one of the "safe countries" for which no quarantine in Austria.
"Numerous ministers may have known in advance that there is the possibility of a quarantine for holidaymakers," commented Labour MEP Diane Abbot.
"But no one has taken the trouble to tell Grant Shapps."
Almost a month after the end of the Corona emergency in Spain and the expiry of the strict curfew, the number of infections in the country are rising again.
Virologists blame the nightlife responsible for the new expansion.
Spain is one of the most popular holiday destinations in the UK.
The British government is currently advising against unnecessary travel to the Spanish mainland, the British government is currently advising against unnecessary travel to the Spanish mainland, excluding the Canaries and Balearic Islands particularly popular with British holidaymakers and Balearic Islands, are particularly popular with British holidaymakers are exempted from this.
So far, more than 272,000 infections with the novel coronavirus and more than 28,000 deaths have been registered in Spain.
Russia: Navy Day: Putin announces hyperhypersonic weapons for warships
Russian President Vladimir Putin has announced the equipment of warships with the most modern hypersonic sound weapons.
With these weapons, which are unique in the world, would expand the fighting capabilities of the Russian naval forces, Putin said on Sunday in St. Petersburg at the central naval parade in St. Petersburg on Sunday.
According to the agency Interfax, the Ministry of Defense also informed the agency Interfax, the Ministry of Defense also informed about successful tests of the hypersonic missile built for the navine-built hypersonic missile.
The hypersound weapons have a multiple of the speed of sound of about 343 meters per second.
They are considered weapons of the future.
Underwater tropedeo will continue to be built
It will also be built on the atomic underwater torpedo Poseidon, it was said.
The planned sea drone is planned for the destruction of coastal targets.
The President, who himself drove with a military boat, said that this year alone, 40 new ships would be put into service at the individual naval associations of the largest country in the world.
Russia has such a large coastal area than no other country in the world.
For 300 years, the Navy has been protecting Russia reliably for 300 years, Putin said at the day celebrated by sailors.
In many other Russian coastal towns, the naval forces also celebrated the Day of the Navy with parades in many other Russian coastal towns.
In Syria, where Russia fights on the side of ruler Bashar al-Assad, the military demonstrated at a arms show in the Mediterranean port of Tartu's strength.
Amunition was also fired.
A video published by the Ministry of Defense featured not only warships, including a submarine, but also combat helicopters and jets.
Hurricane "Hanna" reaches Texas: Help from Corona more difficult
Washington - The first hurricane of this year's Atlantic hurricane has landed ashore in Texas.
Life threatening floods, strong winds and heavy rainfall now threatened parts of the US state, the National Hurricane Center of the US Climate Agency (NOAA) on the night to Sunday (local time).
Governor Greg Abbott declared the state of emergency.
The Corona pandemic rampant Corona pandemic rampant in Texas made it difficult for the work of the helpers, said Abbott, according to the US media.
Evacuees called for caution
"Every hurricane is a tremendous challenge," said Abbott, according to the Houston Chronicle.
Looking to the cyclone in Texas, he added, "This challenge is complicated and will be aggravated considering that it sweeps through an area that is the most affected by Covid-19."
According to Johns Hopkins University, around 5,000 people have died in Texas alone, as a result of the Corona pandemic, around 5,000 people have died in Texas alone as a result of the Corona pandemic.
Abbott called for caution on people who had to leave their homes to be caution.
They should not disregard practices that we have become accustomed to ", such as wearing masks, said the governor said according to the broadcaster CBS.
It is important that everyone kept a distance.
Therefore, in some places, hotel rooms have also been provided in some places.
It should also be tested in emergency shelters on Corona.
Damage had only been reported from the coastal town of Port Mansfield.
Storm warning withdrawn again
With wind speeds of up to 150 kilometres per hour, "Hanna" had hit the island of Padre Island just off the Texas coast.
The tropical storm had previously been upgraded to the hurricane of the lowest level one hurricane.
For the stretch of the coast from Port Mansfield to Sargent, a storm flood warning was issued for the coastal line from Port Mansfield to Sargent and later withdrawn.
Authorities expected a weakening, while "Hanna" moves inland and headed to northeastern Mexico.
"Douglas" is moving to Hawaii
In the Pacific, Hurricane "Douglas" was on the night of Sunday with wind speeds of around 150 kilometres per hour.
However, the hurricane center, however, expected it would continue to weaken.
According to the forecast, it is said to be on Sunday (local time) near the largest islands in Hawaii on Sunday (local time) - then as a storm just below the hurricane threshold.
Over the Atlantic, NOAA anticipated an above-average active hurricane season over the Atlantic.
From June to the end of November, up to ten hurricanes are to be expected from June to the end of November, of which up to six very strong cyclcanes.
On average, there are six hurricanes per year over the Atlantic, three of which develop into storms of great strength.
In view of available climate data and the higher water temperature in the Atlantic and the Caribbean, the probability of a normal season is only 30 percent.
US President Donald Trump wrote via Twitter that his government was closely monitoring the storms and is in contact with the affected states.
Four goals stripped: video assistant "punished" Sassuolo
Sassuolos Filip Djuricic were canceled two goals
Naples - Four goals scored, four goals stridrawn: Sassuolo Calcio experienced a raven-black evening at the 0: 2 (0: 1) at the SSC Naples in the Italian football league Serie A - and was really angry at the video assistants of the referee.
"A festival of ungiven gates for Sassuolo.
Never before has the VAR gone so hard against a team, "commented the" Corriere dello Sport ".
Host Naples had led through a goal by foreign defender Elseid Hisaj in the 8th minute, in the 32nd minute Filip Djuricic cheered the balance in the 32nd minute.
The Video Assistant Referee (VAR) withdrew the hit because of a side position.
Five minutes later, Djuricic shot the ball into the net again - the VAR intervened again.
The referee team also withdrew the goals of attackers Francesco Caputo (50th) and Domenico Berardi (61.).
In the second play, Allan made the 2: 0 final score for Naples and the bitter evening for Sassuolo.
"For Sassuolo, the VAR is worse for Sassuolo, the VAR is worse than a radar trap on the road for Sassuolo and punishes Sassuolo like no team before.
The new technology sets records, "writes the" Gazzetta dello Sport ".
FC Bayern Munich: Pavard injured
Munich (dpa) - The start into the hot preparation phase for the Champions League began with a setback for double winner FC Bayern.
After the first team training, Hansi Flick, who, recovered after a short holiday and a few days of training, Hansi Flick has to consider after the first team training, how he can change his successful defense after the injury of world champion Benjamin Pavard.
The Frenchman, who has the third most minutes behind Captain Manuel Neuer and midfield leader Joshua Kimmich, suffered a belt injury at the left foot root and threatens to be missing in decisive king class duels.
In the Munich Schmuddelwetter, the right defender stopped a training game and was driven from the field with a golf kart.
How long the unrestricted regular player has to pause in the fight for the title is open.
The 24-year-old will be difficult to play in the eighth finals against FC Chelsea on 8 August, the 24-year-old can hope for the final tournament, which will start on 12 August in Lisbon.
The Bavarians do not want to be stopped from the mishap from the training on Sunday.
In his personal Triple formula, Flick called the three attributes he wants to see from his stars on his way to Portugal's capital.
Quality, intensity and concentration are to be shown by his vict-hungry title collectors are to show quality, intensity and concentration in the following 28 days until the king class final game on August 23rd.
"We simply mastered the compulsory tasks with championship and cup.
Now it is important to create something special, "said Flick.
However, until the Munichers can deal with the final tournament and previously a training camp in the Algarve, the eight-finals against FC Chelsea.
After the 3: 0 in the first leg before the Corona break, the Londoners should not become a Bavarian nightmare like in the lost "Finale dahoam" in 2012.
"We have to go through the door.
We want to win, create good conditions and regain confidence with a good game, "demanded Flick.
A test for attunement will be held on Friday against Olympique Marseille on Friday.
With a long speech, Flick had swore his stars, who had 13 days after the double, for a unique August.
He welcomed 31 players on Säbener Straße, including the new players around Edel-Einkauf Leroy Sané, who met all new colleagues on the square for the first time after his change from Manchester City for the first time after his change from Manchester City.
"Leroy, like all the new ones," reported Flick.
But instead of talking about the new season, when Sané & Co. are no longer allowed to train, Flick preferred to talk about the current title project of the German series champion.
After days of individual and small group training, team strength for the Londoners, who are in the rhythm in contrast to the patch ensemble.
After that, the Munichers could face a quarterfinals against FC Barcelona and Lionel Messi, in the semifinals, Real Madrid, Manchester City or Juventus Turin are possible opponents in the semifinals.
A way to the final in Lisbon "is not quite so easy," stressed the head coach, who can rely on the services of his new assistant Miroslav Klose in training.
The World Cup record scorer Klose and Flick know from many joint tournament preparation, what is particularly important in the 0-to 100 attunement.
With his current team, working is "a pleasure" with his current team, "Flick praised.
The "focus on winning" is an impressive characteristic of his team.
At the tournament with nine-teams was also ambitious at the tournament with nine-teams on Sunday.
Of the performers, including the emigrant Thiago and defender David Alaba, whose whereabouts is not secured beyond the king class season.
Formula 1 needs a special rule to select their world champion
Since it is not possible to compete on the required number of continents, the FIA must improvise to award the World Cup titles.
All American races were cancelled.
Racing calendar is becoming more and more concrete
The race calendar of the current Formula One season continues to take shape.
Three further race tracks were added to the ten confirmed Grand Prix confirmed so far, three more racetrack were added to the ten confirmed Grand Prix during the week.
In October, the Nürburgring in Germany and in Portimão, Portugal.
On November 1st, Lewis Hamilton and Co. will be fighting for World Championship points at the traditional Italian race track in Imola.
As a result, the 2020 race calendar is, to the current state, the race calendar now includes 13 runs.
"We are pleased to continue to make significant progress towards the completion of our plans for the 2020 season," said Formula 1 boss Chase Carey.
In total, this extraordinary season, a total of 15 to 18 races are to be completed in the top class of motorsport in this extraordinary season.
Formula 1 wants to close its season in Asia.
The final race calendar is to be fixed and published in the coming weeks.
Prior to the already officially scheduled races in Bahrain and Abu Dhabi in December, according to media reports that appearances in Vietnam and Malaysia at the end of November.
Regulations require races on three continents
However, the regulations of Formula 1 require at least three continents for the awarding of the World Cup require at least races on three continents.
Even if, as currently planned, only two continents, there should be a world champion.
With the help of a special rule, the FIA wants to award the title based on "exceptional circumstances" because of the coronavirus pandemic.
The traditional start of the season in Australia in March had to be cancelled at the short notice due to the corona crisis.
A return to the continent this year is not an issue.
In addition, Formula 1 will not be a guest in America this year.
Refusal is met with criticism in Brazil
Due to the tense corona situation, the races will not take place in Canada, the USA, Mexico and Brazil.
"We look forward to being back with them next season," said Carey.
The cancellation of the American races was met with criticism, especially in Brazil: "The cancellation was not surprising for us, but we cannot accept the reasons for this," said Tamas Rohonyi, promoter of the Grand Prix in São Paulo.
For example, the number of infections in the São Paulo area are significantly lower than in other regions of Brazil.
The concerns of some teams about not wanting to drive in Brazil would not justify a rejection.
We are prepared for the required security measures.
Greta Thunberg: Evil eye against Donald Trump went around the world
Greta Thunberg spoke about her meeting with US President Donald Trump.
Greta Thunberg was a guest on the well-known latenight show by Stephen Colbert and revealed in an interview what she had in her mind during her encounter with Donald Trump.
Klimaatkivistin Greta Thunberg was a guest in a popular US Latenight show.
She told, among other things, about her struggle against the powerful of the world.
The teenager also spoke about her famous "evil eye" during her encounter with Donald Trump.
New York City - Over the past two years, climate activist Greta Thunberg has drawn attention to herself with her tireless commitment to the "Fridays For Future" movement.
Now she spoke in a well-known latenight show about her plans for the future, as well as her meeting with US President Donald Trump at the UN climate summit last year.
Latenight presenter Stephen Colbert welcomed the 17-year-old Thunberg to your show on Tuesday and conducted a longer interview with the Swede.
She spoke not only about her fight against climate change, but also about her conflict with the powerful of the world.
"There are some things that surprised me," she said.
"How far people go to direct the focus away from the climate crisis," she shook.
"Everything from organized hate campaigns to threats, just because a group of children are taking to the streets".
Heads of state and leaders who mock at them on social media, or even trying to silence them on social media, finds her "funny" as they are showing the reactions "because they have no other answer to it."
It was particularly interesting at the end of the interview, when Greta Thunberg was approached to a well-known scene in which she took a bitterly evil look after US President Trump.
At the 2019 UN Climate Summit in New York, for which the nude sailed across the Atlantic, her expressive view was captured by the cameras and has since been seen by countless people on the Internet.
The short clip turned into a GIF, an animated image that ultimately became one of the most commonly used images for Trump opponents.
But what did the 17-year-old think about the US president at that moment?
To the relatively open question of Stephen Colbert, she replied briefly and dry: "To be honest, I think it doesn't need any further explanation".
The experienced satirist Colbert had not expect the quick-answer and disappeared laughing from the picture.
With her "How dare you?" speech on the principles of climate protection.
Former Dortmunder Immobile with pack of three for Lazio Rome
Ciro Immobile is now in the race for Europe's Golden Shoe with Bavaria ’ s Robert Lewandowski.
The former Dortmunder Ciro Immobile continues to have the best chances of becoming a goalscorer in the Italian football championship.
The former BVB professional scored three goals in the 5: 1 (1: 1) victory of Lazio Rome at Hellas Verona.
This means that the 30-year-old now has 34 season goals from the fourth of the table two games of the season before the end, the 30-year-old now has 34 season goals on his account - Robert Lewandowski from FC Bayern MÃ1 ⁄ 4nchen scored just as many in the past Bundesliga season.
In Italy, Cristiano Ronaldo with 30 goals so far, the Portuguese superstar met Sampdoria Genoa in the evening.
Fleetwood-Mac co-founder Peter Green died
His life was like a rollercoaster ride: After a rapid ascent with Fleetwood Mac, it went steeply downhill and then slowly uphill.
Now blues rock guitarist Peter Green died at the age of 73.
Ingenious guitarist, drug junkie, cult follower: The co-founder of the band Fleetwood Mac, Peter Green, is dead.
He died peacefully in his sleep at the age of 73, he died peacefully in his sleep at the age of 73, family members on Saturday in an official statement that another statement would be announced for the next few days.
Top musicians such as Peter Frampton praised Green as one of the best blues and rock guitarists.
Mick Fleetwood spoke of a "monumental loss" for all former and current members of the band Fleetwood Mac.
The drummer Fleetwood and guitarist Green had founded the now legendary band in London in 1967, his dreamy instrumental hit "Albatross".
The life of the musician ("The End Of The Game", "In The Skies") resembled a rollercoaster ride.
With Fleetwood Mac, Green experienced a rapid rise with Fleetwood Mac - the band celebrated their greatest successes but then without him.
There was said to have been controversy because Green wanted to donate all the profits of the group for charity.
He began to appear in wide robes and with a large crucifix.
Psychological problems also played a role.
Three years later, Green left the band in 1970.
This was a social descent.
The blues rock guitarist suffered from drug abuse and schizophrenia, as biographers reported.
For a long time, Green was treated in psychiatry.
During much of the 1970s, the musician disappeared from the scene.
He is said to have lived on the street, worked as a cemetery gardener and spent a time in an Israeli kibbutz.
Green was born in 1946, the son of a Jewish working family in Bethnal Green.
At a young age, he became enthusiastic with American blues musicians such as B.B. King and Muddy Waters.
At the age of eleven, he learned the first guitar lessons at the age of eleven.
At the age of 15, the teenager began playing guitar at the age of 15 and five years later he got the chance to be on stage as a lead guitarist for the instrumental band Peter B's Looners.
He was hired by the bluesbreakers as a replacement for his idol Eric Clapton for the Bluesbreakers as replacement for his idol Eric Clapton.
In the middle of the blues boom, Green founded Fleetwood Mac in the summer of 1967, along with his blues breakers colleagues Mick Fleetwood and John McVie.
The song "Albatross" gave the group the first number one hit in the winter of 1968 / 69 and catapulted it to the top of the British music scene.
But the rapid ascent soon showed his downsides: Green did not cope with the media hype, his experiments with the drug LSD became more and more extreme.
He later commented on the life between music and addiction in an interview: "The worst thing that happened to me in life is the drugs - the best thing was to land a number one hit".
Towards the end of the decade, Green achieved a surprising success in 1979 with an album inspired by religious themes.
Fleetwood Mac swam without him in a new formation on a wave of success.
Her 1977 album "Rumours", released in 1977, sold more than 40 million copies worldwide.
Despite several minor solo successes, Green did not make a major comeback until he started in 1996 with a group of friendly musicians in 1996.
The British "Daily Telegraph" spoke of a rock star who returned to Earth.
Green released several albums with the Peter Green Splinter Group until the band disbanded in 2004.
For music experts, he was a blues legend for music experts - and with his soft sound, he was one of the most influential guitarists of recent decades.
